Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,254
Grant applicants; funding; authorized resources.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, any grant applicant may utilize any resource available to it for the local funds or in-kind donations required in subdivision (3) of section 81-12,251, including, but not limited to:

(1) Any resource collected and disbursed pursuant to the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act;

(2) Any federal funding;

(3) Any donation or contribution of private funding; and

(4) The estimated market value of any donated good or service from any public or private source.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 114.
July 18, 2026
Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act, see section 18-2701.